Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Kentucky Model Procurement Code
45A.067.
Requirement for registration with Department of Revenue to collect and remit sales and use tax — Exemption — Applicability to foreign persons — Administrative regulation.

As used in this section:

“Affiliate” means a person who directly or indirectly owns or controls, is owned or controlled by, or is under common ownership or control with another person or group of persons; and

“Person” includes any individual, firm, copartnership, pass-through entity as defined in KRS

141.010

, joint venture, association, social club, fraternal organization, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, trustee, syndicate, cooperative, assignee, governmental unit or agency, or any other group or combination acting as a unit.

The Commonwealth shall not contract to acquire goods or services, and a person shall not contract to supply goods or services to the Commonwealth, unless, prior to or contemporaneous with entering into the contract, the person contracting to supply goods or services and its affiliates register with the Department of Revenue to collect and remit the sales and use tax imposed by KRS Chapter 139.

Nothing in this section shall require a person or affiliate to register if the person or affiliate does not make sales to customers in the Commonwealth.

The provisions of subsection (2) of this section are specifically applicable to foreign persons, notwithstanding the fact that the foreign person or the affiliate may not otherwise be legally obligated to collect and remit the sales and use tax.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall promulgate an administrative regulation to establish the procedure ensuring compliance with the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 43, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2018 ch. 171, § 66, effective April 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 207, § 66, effective April 27, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/27/2018). This statute was amended by 2018 Ky. Acts chs. 171 and 207, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

45A.070.
Definitions for KRS 45A.070 to 45A.180.

As used in KRS

45A.070

to

45A.180

, unless the context in which they are used clearly requires a different meaning:

“Best value” means a procurement in which the decision is based on the primary objective of meeting the specific business requirements and best interests of the Commonwealth. These decisions shall be based on objective and quantifiable criteria that shall include price and the reciprocal preference for a resident bidder required under KRS

45A.494

that have been communicated to the offerors as set forth in the invitation for bids.

“Cost-reimbursement contract” means a contract under which the Commonwealth reimburses the contractor for those contract costs, within a stated ceiling, which are allowable and allocable in accordance with cost principles as provided in KRS

45A.215

, and a fee, if any.

“Established catalogue price” means the price included in the most current catalogue, price list, schedule, or other form that:

Is regularly maintained by the manufacturer or vendor of an item;

Is either published or otherwise available for inspection by customers; and

States prices at which sales are currently or were last made to a significant number of buyers constituting the general buying public for that item.

“Invitation for bids” means all documents, whether attached or incorporated by reference, utilized for soliciting bids in accordance with the procedures set forth in KRS

45A.080

of this code.

“Request for proposals” means all documents, whether attached or incorporated by reference, utilized for soliciting proposals in accordance with the procedures set forth in KRS

45A.085

,

45A.090

,

45A.095

,

45A.100

, or

45A.180

.

“Responsible bidder or offeror” means a person who has the capability in all respects to perform fully the contract requirements, and the integrity and reliability which will assure good faith performance.

“Responsive bidder” means a person who has submitted a bid under KRS

45A.080

which conforms in all material respects to the invitation for bids, so that all bidders may stand on equal footing with respect to the method and timeliness of submission and as to the substance of any resulting contract.

“Reverse auction” means a real-time, structured bidding process, usually lasting less than one (1) hour, and taking place at a previously scheduled time and Internet location, during which multiple bidders, anonymous to each other, submit revised, lower bids to provide the solicited good or leased space. “Reverse auction” does not apply to construction projects, including but not limited to road, bridge, and building projects.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 15, effective January 1, 1979; 1990, ch. 496, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 26, effective May 30, 1997; 2003, ch. 98, § 3, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 63, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 162, §
7, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). This sections was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts chs. 63 and 162, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

45A.075.
Methods of awarding state contracts.

Except as otherwise authorized by law, all state contracts shall be awarded by:

Competitive sealed bidding, pursuant to KRS

45A.080

;

Competitive negotiation, pursuant to KRS

45A.077

,

45A.085

,

45A.090

, or

45A.180

;

Noncompetitive negotiation, pursuant to KRS

45A.095

; or

Small purchase procedures, pursuant to KRS

45A.100

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 16, effective January 1, 1979; 2003, ch. 98, § 4, effective June 24, 2003; 2016 ch. 67, § 2, effective April 8, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/8/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 67, sec. 16 provided that the amendments made to this statute and KRS

45A.030

and the creation of KRS

45A.077

in that Act shall apply only to a project for which the procurement process is initiated on or after the effective date of that Act, which was April 8, 2016, either through the initial invitation for bids, request for proposals, or otherwise.

45A.077.
Public-private partnership delivery method of awarding state contracts for capital construction projects.

A public-private partnership delivery method may be utilized as provided in this section and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder. State contracts using this method shall be awarded by competitive negotiation.

A contracting body utilizing a public-private partnership shall continue to be responsible for oversight of any function that is delegated to or otherwise performed by a private partner.

On or before December 31, 2016, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations setting forth criteria to be used in determining when a public-private partnership is to be used for a particular project. The administrative regulations shall reflect the intent of the General Assembly to promote and encourage the use of public-private partnerships in the Commonwealth. The secretary shall consult with design-builders, construction managers, contractors, design professionals including engineers and architects, and other appropriate professionals during the development of these administrative regulations.

A request for proposal for a project utilizing a public-private partnership shall include at a minimum:

The parameters of the proposed public-private partnership agreement;

The duties and responsibilities to be performed by the private partner or partners;

The methods of oversight to be employed by the contracting body;

The duties and responsibilities that are to be performed by the contracting body and any other partners to the contract;

The evaluation factors and the relative weight of each to be used in the scoring of awards;

Plans for financing and operating the qualifying project and the revenues, service payments, bond financings, and appropriations of public funds needed for the qualifying project;

Comprehensive documentation of the experience, capabilities, capitalization and financial condition, and other relevant qualifications of the private entity;

The ability of a private partner or partners to quickly respond to the needs presented in the request for proposal, and the importance of economic development opportunities represented by the qualifying project. In evaluating proposals, preference shall be given to a plan that includes the involvement of small businesses as subcontractors, to the extent that small businesses can provide services in a competitive manner, unless any preference interferes with the qualification for federal or other funds; and

Other information required by the contracting body or the cabinet to evaluate the proposals submitted by respondents and the overall proposed public-private partnership.

A private entity desiring to be a private partner shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the contracting body or the cabinet that it is capable of performing any duty, responsibility, or function it may be authorized or directed to perform as part of the public-private partnership agreement.

When a request for proposal for a project utilizing a public-private partnership is issued for a capital project, the contracting body shall transmit a copy of the request for proposal to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee staff, clearly identifying to the staff that a public-private partnership is being utilized. The contracting body shall submit the final contract to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee under KRS

45.763

before work may be begun on the project.

A request for proposal or other solicitation may be canceled, or all proposals may be rejected, if it is determined in writing that the action is taken in the best interest of the Commonwealth and approved by the purchasing officer.

Beginning July 1, 2024, in the case of any public-private partnership for a capital project with an aggregate value of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) or more, the project shall be authorized by the General Assembly, by inclusion in the branch budget bill or by any other means specified by the General Assembly, explicitly identifying and authorizing the utilization of a public-private partnership delivery method for the applicable capital project. The authorization of a capital project required by this subsection is in addition to any other statutorily required authorization for a capital project.

The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any public-private partnership project made public through a request for proposal or a public notice of an unsolicited proposal issued prior to July 1, 2024.

Any corporation as described by KRS 45.750(2)(c), or as created under the Kentucky Revised Statutes as a governmental agency and instrumentality of the Commonwealth, that manages its capital construction program shall:

Adhere to the administrative regulations promulgated under this section when utilizing a public-private partnership for financing capital projects;

Report to legislative committees as specified in this section; and

Submit public-private partnership agreements issued by it to the General Assembly for authorization as provided in subsection (8) of this section.

The governing body of a postsecondary institution that manages its capital construction program under KRS

164A.580

shall report to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee staff as specified in this section.

Any provision of a public-private partnership agreement issued by a postsecondary institution which provides for a lease by or to the postsecondary institution shall be valid and enforceable if approved by the governing board of the institution.

A person or business may submit an unsolicited proposal to a governmental body, which may receive the unsolicited proposal.

Within ninety (90) days of receiving an unsolicited proposal, a governmental body may elect to consider further action on the proposal, at which point the governmental body shall provide public notice of the proposal. Discussion of the project shall not be deemed a solicitation of the project or its concepts after public notice is given. The public notice shall:

Provide specific information regarding the proposed nature, timing, and scope of the unsolicited proposal, except that trade secrets, financial records, or other records of the person or business making the proposal shall not be posted unless otherwise agreed to by the governmental body and the person or business; and

Provide for a notice period for the submission of competing proposals as follows:

Unsolicited proposals valued below five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be posted for thirty (30) days;

Unsolicited proposals valued between five million dollars ($5,000,000) and twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be posted for sixty (60) days; and

Unsolicited proposals valued over twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be posted for ninety (90) days.

Upon the end of the notice period provided under paragraph (b)2. of this subsection, the governmental body may consider the unsolicited proposal and any competing proposals received. If the governmental body determines it is in the best interest of the Commonwealth to implement some or all of the concepts contained within the unsolicited proposal or competing proposals received by it, the governmental body may begin an open, competitive procurement process to do so pursuant to this chapter.

An unsolicited proposal shall be deemed rejected if no written response is received from the governmental body within ninety (90) days of submission, during which time the governmental body has not taken any action on the proposal under paragraph (b) of this subsection.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 67, § 3, effective April 8, 2016; 2017 ch. 132, § 5, effective March 27, 2017; 2018 ch. 92, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2020 ch. 91, § 43, effective April 15, 2020; 2022 ch. 212, § 27, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/8/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 67, sec. 16 provided that the amendments made to KRS

45A.030

and

45A.075

and the creation of this statute in that Act shall apply only to a project for which the procurement process is initiated on or after the effective date of that Act, which was April 8, 2016, either through the initial invitation for bids, request for proposals, or otherwise.

45A.080.
Competitive sealed bidding.

Contracts exceeding the amount provided by KRS

45A.100

shall be awarded by competitive sealed bidding, which may include the use of a reverse auction, unless it is determined in writing that this method is not practicable. Factors to be considered in determining whether competitive sealed bidding is not practicable shall include:

Whether specifications can be prepared that permit award on the basis of best value; and

The available sources, the time and place of performance, and other relevant circumstances as are appropriate for the use of competitive sealed bidding.

The invitation for bids shall state that awards shall be made on the basis of best value. In any contract which is awarded under an invitation to bid which requires delivery by a specified date and imposes a penalty for late delivery, if the delivery is late, the contractor shall be given the opportunity to present evidence that the cause of the delay was beyond his control. If it is the opinion of the purchasing officer that there is sufficient justification for delayed delivery, the purchasing officer may adjust or waive any penalty that is provided for in the contract.

Adequate public notice of the invitation for bids and any reverse auction shall be given a sufficient time prior to the date set forth for the opening of bids or beginning of the reverse auction. The notice may include posting on the Internet or publication in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in the state as determined by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet not less than seven (7) days before the date set for the opening of the bids and any reverse auction. The provisions of this subsection shall also apply to price contracts and purchase contracts of state institutions of higher education.

Bids shall be opened publicly or entered through a reverse auction at the time and place designated in the invitation for bids. At the time the bids are opened, or the reverse auction has ended, the purchasing agency shall announce the agency’s engineer’s estimate, if applicable, and make it a part of the agency records pertaining to the letting of any contract for which bids were received. Each written or reverse auction bid, together with the name of the bidder and the agency’s engineer’s estimate, shall be recorded and be open to public inspection. Electronic bid opening and posting of the required information for public viewing shall satisfy the requirements of this subsection.

The contract shall be awarded by written notice to the responsive and responsible bidder whose bid offers the best value.

Correction or withdrawal of written or reverse auction bids shall be allowed only to the extent permitted by regulations issued by the secretary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 17, effective January 1, 1979; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 1, effective February 10, 1979; 1982, ch. 282, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 278, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 60, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 27, effective May 30, 1997; 1998, ch. 120, § 10, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 509, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 63, § 3, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(10/19/2004). 2004 (1st Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 1, sec. 2, provides, “Notwithstanding
KRS

18A.225

,

45A.022

,

45A.080

,

45A.085

,

45A.090

,

45A.225

to

45A.290

, or any other provision of KRS Chapter 45A to the contrary, retroactive to August 12, 2004, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall implement the provisions of this Act by amending the previously negotiated contracts for public employee health insurance. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide an actuarial certification that the self-insured contract amounts are actuarially sound. Any contracts entered into or modified pursuant to this section shall be forwarded to the Legislative Research Commission.”

45A.085.
Competitive negotiation.

When, under administrative regulations promulgated by the secretary or under KRS

45A.180

, the purchasing officer determines in writing that the use of competitive sealed bidding is not practicable, and except as provided in KRS

45A.095

and

45A.100

, a contract may be awarded by competitive negotiation, which may include the use of a reverse auction.

Adequate public notice of the request for proposals and any reverse auction shall be given in the same manner and circumstances as provided in KRS 45A.080(3).

Contracts other than contracts for projects utilizing an alternative project delivery method under KRS

45A.180

may be competitively negotiated when it is determined in writing by the purchasing officer that the bids received by competitive sealed bidding either are unreasonable as to all or part of the requirements, or were not independently reached in open competition, and for which each competitive bidder has been notified of the intention to negotiate and is given reasonable opportunity to negotiate.

Contracts for projects utilizing an alternative project delivery method shall be processed in accordance with KRS

45A.180

.

The request for proposals shall indicate the relative importance of price and other evaluation factors, and any reverse auction procedures.

Award shall be made to the responsible and responsive offeror whose proposal is determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the Commonwealth, taking into consideration price and the evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals and the reciprocal preference for resident bidders required under KRS

45A.494

.

Written or oral discussions shall be conducted with all responsible offerors who submit proposals determined in writing to be reasonably susceptible of being selected for award. Discussions shall not disclose any information derived from proposals submitted by competing offerors. Discussions need not be conducted:

With respect to prices, where the prices are fixed by law, reverse auction, or administrative regulation, except that consideration shall be given to competitive terms and conditions;

Where time of delivery or performance will not permit discussions; or

Where it can be clearly demonstrated and documented from the existence of adequate competition or prior experience with the particular supply, service, or construction item, that acceptance of an initial offer without discussion would result in fair and reasonable best value procurement, and the request for proposals notifies all offerors of the possibility that award may be made on the basis of the initial offers.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 18, effective January 1, 1979; 1979 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 2, effective February 10, 1979; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 28, effective May 30, 1997; 2003, ch. 98, § 5, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 63, § 4, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 162, §
8, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts chs. 63 and 162, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(10/19/2004). 2004 (1st Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 1, sec. 2, provides, “Notwithstanding
KRS

18A.225

,

45A.022

,

45A.080

,

45A.085

,

45A.090

,

45A.225

to

45A.290

, or any other provision of KRS Chapter 45A to the contrary, retroactive to August 12, 2004, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall implement the provisions of this Act by amending the previously negotiated contracts for public employee health insurance. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide an actuarial certification that the self-insured contract amounts are actuarially sound. Any contracts entered into or modified pursuant to this section shall be forwarded to the Legislative Research Commission.”

45A.090.
Negotiation after competitive sealed bidding when all bids exceed available funds.

In the event that all bids submitted pursuant to competitive sealed bidding under KRS

45A.080

result in bid prices in excess of the funds available for the purchase, and the chief purchasing officer determines in writing:

That there are no additional funds available from any source so as to permit an award to the responsive and responsible bidder whose bid offers the best value; and

The best interest of the state will not permit the delay attendant to a resolicitation under revised specifications, or for revised quantities, under competitive sealed bidding as provided in KRS

45A.080

,

then a negotiated award may be made as set forth in subsections (2) or (3) of this section.

Where there is more than one (1) bidder, competitive negotiations pursuant to KRS 45A.085(3) shall be conducted with the three (3) (two (2) if there are only two (2)) bidders determined in writing to be the most responsive and responsible bidders, based on criteria contained in the bid invitation and the reciprocal preference for resident bidders under KRS

45A.494

. Such competitive negotiations shall be conducted under the following restrictions:

If discussions pertaining to the revision of the specifications or quantities are held with any potential offeror, all other potential offerors shall be afforded an opportunity to take part in such discussions; and

A request for proposals, based upon revised specifications or quantities, shall be issued as promptly as possible, shall provide for an expeditious response to the revised requirements, and shall be awarded upon the basis of best value.

Where, after competitive sealed bidding, it is determined in writing that there is only one (1) responsive and responsible bidder, a noncompetitive negotiated award may be made with such bidder in accordance with KRS

45A.095

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 19, effective January 1, 1979; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 29, effective May 30, 1997; 2003, ch. 98, § 6, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 162, § 9, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(10/19/2004). 2004 (1st Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 1, sec. 2, provides, “Notwithstanding
KRS

18A.225

,

45A.022

,

45A.080

,

45A.085

,

45A.090

,

45A.225

to

45A.290

, or any other provision of KRS Chapter 45A to the contrary, retroactive to August 12, 2004, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall implement the provisions of this Act by amending the previously negotiated contracts for public employee health insurance. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide an actuarial certification that the self-insured contract amounts are actuarially sound. Any contracts entered into or modified pursuant to this section shall be forwarded to the Legislative Research Commission.”

Opinions of Attorney General.

Competitive sealed bidding and competitive negotiation are two separate procurement processes that do not overlap; a public disclosure of bid documents associated with a competitive sealed bid cannot be delayed until a determination is made as to whether the contracting agency will move to competitive negotiation.

OAG 98-11

.

If a decision is made to move from a competitive sealed bid procurement process to a competitive negotiation, the original sealed bids must be disclosed when they are opened and cannot remain closed until a contract is awarded or negotiations are canceled; the two processes are successive, and the competitive sealed bidding must end with the bids being disclosed so that the competitive negotiation may begin.

OAG 98-11

.

45A.095.
Definitions — Noncompetitive negotiation.

For purposes of this section:

“Emergency condition” means a situation which creates a threat or impending threat to public health, welfare, or safety such as may arise by reason of fires, floods, tornadoes, other natural or man-caused disasters, epidemics, riots, enemy attack, sabotage, explosion, power failure, energy shortages, transportation emergencies, equipment failures, state or federal legislative mandates, or similar events. The existence of the emergency condition creates an immediate and serious need for services, construction, or items of tangible personal property that cannot be met through normal procurement methods and the lack of which would seriously threaten the functioning of government, the preservation or protection of property, or the health or safety of any person; and

“Sole source” means a situation in which there is only one (1) known capable supplier of a commodity or service, occasioned by the unique nature of the requirement, the supplier, or market conditions.

A contract may be made by noncompetitive negotiation only:

For sole source purchases;

When competition is not feasible, as determined by the purchasing officer in writing prior to award, under administrative regulations promulgated by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or the governing boards of universities operating under KRS Chapter 164A;

When emergency conditions exist; or

For sponsorships, naming rights, or other advertising or similar considerations for which competition is not feasible

Insofar as it is practical, no fewer than three (3) suppliers shall be solicited to submit written or oral quotations whenever it is determined that competitive sealed bidding is not feasible. Award shall be made to the supplier offering the best value. The names of the suppliers submitting quotations and the date and amount of each quotation shall be placed in the procurement file and maintained as a public record.

Competitive bids may not be required:

For contractual services where no competition exists, such as telephone service, electrical energy, and other public utility services;

Where rates are fixed by law or ordinance;

For library books;

For commercial items that are purchased for resale;

For interests in real property;

For visiting speakers, professors, expert witnesses, and performing artists;

For personal service contracts executed pursuant to KRS

45A.690

to

45A.725

; and

For agricultural products in accordance with KRS

45A.645

.

The chief procurement officer, the head of a using agency, or a person authorized in writing as the designee of either officer may make or authorize others to make emergency procurements when an emergency condition exists.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may negotiate directly for the purchase of contractual services, supplies, materials, or equipment in bona fide emergencies regardless of estimated costs. The existence of the emergency shall be fully explained, in writing, by the head of the agency for which the purchase is to be made. The explanation shall be approved by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and shall include the name of the vendor receiving the contract along with any other price quotations and a written determination for selection of the vendor receiving the contract. This information shall be filed with the record of all such purchases and made available to the public. Where practical, standard specifications shall be followed in making emergency purchases. In any event, every effort should be made to effect a competitively established price for purchases made by the state.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 20, effective January 1, 1979; 1990, ch. 496, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 30, effective May 30, 1997; 2002, ch. 344, § 9, effective July 15, 2002; 2017 ch. 175, § 6, effective June 29, 2017.

Opinions of Attorney General.

If a local board of education adopts the provisions of the Model Procurement Code applicable to the state and also adopts a regulation similar to that which has been promulgated by the Department of Finance (now Finance and Administration Cabinet) relating to noncompetitive negotiations, then items for resale such as caps and gowns and graduation invitations may be handled through noncompetitive negotiation.

OAG 80-108

.

Visiting speakers, professors, expert witnesses, and performing artists, are excluded from the provision of this section requiring personal service contracts under KRS

45A.690

to KRS

45A.725

, including KRS 45A.695(3).

OAG 90-124

.

There is no indication of imminent harm to government, property, or lives where there are serious allegations regarding the financial affairs of Western Kentucky University. The emergency exception to the competitive bidding law does not apply.

OAG 92-40

.

45A.096.
Definitions for KRS 45A.096 and 45A.097.

As used in this section and KRS

45A.097

:

“Business” has the same meaning as in KRS

11A.010

;

“Commemoration” means an object, such as a plaque or a sign, honoring a living person or an event, but does not include naming rights;

“Does business with” or “doing business with” has the same meaning as in KRS

11A.010

;

“Donation” means a monetary or in-kind contribution given to a governmental body to further the governmental body’s mission with no tangible or intangible benefit to the donor. Name recognition in promotional materials or on a commemoration or memorial shall not constitute a tangible or intangible benefit to a donor;

“Gift” means a payment, loan, subscription, advance, deposit of money, service, or anything of monetary value given to a governmental body to further a governmental body’s mission, where only the governmental body receives the tangible or intangible benefit, and no personal benefits accrue to any individual;

“Memorial” means an object, such as a plaque or a sign, honoring a deceased person or an event, but does not include naming rights;

“Naming rights” means a form of advertising sponsorship contracted by one (1) of the methods in KRS 45A.075(1) or (2) or

45A.077

, where a business or other entity purchases the right to name a building, structure, or any other physical property owned or operated by the Commonwealth for a defined period of time, for consideration. No naming rights shall be granted to alter the names of state parks, cemeteries, historical memorials, battlefields, state institutions of higher education, historical landmarks, the Capitol, the Capitol Annex, lakes, or rivers;

“Person” means an individual or any legal entity through which business is conducted for profit;

“Prohibited source” means any person, company, or organization that:

Has a current contractual relationship with a governmental body;

Conducts operations that are regulated by a governmental body;

May be lobbying or attempting to influence matters of that governmental body;

That has any interests that might be affected by the performance or nonperformance of official duties of the governmental body or the governmental body’s employees; or

Is a person, company, or organization currently bidding on or proposing a contractual project with the governmental body under one (1) of the methods established in KRS

45A.075

or

45A.077

;

“Public benefit” means a benefit accrued to a governmental body of the Commonwealth to further the mission of or improve the governmental body or its infrastructure; and

“Sponsorship” means an agreement for the receipt of cash or noncash value by a governmental body from a business or other entity in exchange for advertising or similar commercial considerations, including event sponsorships.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 175, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

45A.097.
Governmental body’s acceptance of donation and gifts and consideration of establishing commemoration, memorial, naming rights, or sponsorships.

A governmental body may accept donations and gifts from persons or businesses to further the governmental body’s mission or to benefit the Commonwealth. Donations and gifts shall not be from a prohibited source.

In exchange for a donation or gift, a governmental body may consider an accompanying request for a commemoration or memorial, but all such requests involving state property shall be subject to approval by the secretary.

Except as provided in KRS 45A.095(2)(d), naming rights of structures, buildings, or any other physical property owned or operated by the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall be competitively awarded pursuant to KRS Chapter 45A and subject to review and approval by the secretary. Naming rights shall not constitute an endorsement of a particular business by the Commonwealth.

Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 11A, a governmental body may accept and solicit sponsorships from persons and businesses in the following manner:

A sponsorship shall be for a defined period of time, a specific event, or a particular governmental body purchase or need;

A governmental body seeking to solicit a sponsorship shall advertise the sponsorship opportunity on its Web site, newsletter, or other written media for a minimum of seven (7) calendar days. A sponsorship opportunity shall describe the number of potential sponsorships available, the relative importance of price and other evaluation factors used to ensure “best value” as defined in KRS

45A.070

, and the advertising or similar commercial considerations available from the Commonwealth for a particular sponsorship opportunity;

The governmental body shall notify the Office of Material and Procurement Services in the Office of the Controller of the Finance and Administration Cabinet by providing copies of its sponsorship opportunity advertisements to the office. If the Office of Procurement Services approves or does not respond to the governmental body within one (1) business day of notification, the governmental body may proceed under this subsection;

At the end of the advertising period for a sponsorship, all responses shall be evaluated in accordance with the evaluation factors set forth in the sponsorship opportunity;

Written or oral discussions may be conducted with responsible bidders in accordance with KRS 45A.085(7);

A sponsorship shall be awarded to the responsible bidder determined in writing to be most advantageous to the Commonwealth, taking into consideration the evaluation factors set forth in the sponsorship opportunity. All evaluation documentation, scoring, and summary conclusions of the award shall be made a part of the file or governmental body record;

If insufficient eligible responses are received in response to the advertising of a sponsorship opportunity, and the purchasing officer determines in writing that further bidding would not likely result in additional responsive proposals being received by the Commonwealth, then noncompetitive negotiations with non-prohibited sources may be used to award contracts for the remaining number of sponsorships available;

A sponsorship shall not constitute an endorsement of a particular business by the Commonwealth as the sole vendor of choice; and

An entity that is a prohibited source may be considered for a sponsorship opportunity only if there is a written finding by the purchasing officer that:

The entity is not lobbying or attempting to influence matters of the governmental body; and

The sponsorship will provide:

A public benefit to the Commonwealth; or

Economic development or enhanced tourism in the Commonwealth.

An entity that is a prohibited source due to its current contractual relationship with a governmental body may provide conferences or training events for the benefit of the governmental body only:

When the entity does not have any interests that might be affected by the performance or nonperformance of the governmental body’s official duties; and

The conference or training promotes safety, economic development, or tourism in the Commonwealth, or there is otherwise a public benefit to the Commonwealth.

Governmental body employees whose official duties include acceptance or solicitation of donations, gifts, or sponsorships shall not be involved with:

The solicitation or award of contracts by the governmental body; or

The noncompetitive negotiation of naming rights of structures, buildings, or any physical property owned or operated by the Commonwealth.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 175, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.